Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2089.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 301. Adoption by regulations.* * *(e) Electric vehicle charging stations.--The department shall, within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, promulgate regulations requiring new nonresidential buildings to provide electrical service capacity for electric vehicles in accordance with the following:(1) The electrical service capacity to be provided must 12345678910111213141516171819 serve the number of electric vehicle charging parking spaces as follows:(i) For parking lots with fewer than 25 total parking spaces for the use of hotels, motels, restaurants, offices or health care facilities, at least one level 1 electric vehicle charging parking space is required.(ii) In addition to the requirement under subparagraph (i), for parking lots with fewer than 25 total parking spaces for the use of restaurants, at least one level 2 electric vehicle charging parking space is required.(iii) For parking lots with at least 25 but fewer than 500 total parking spaces for the use of retail facilities, hotels, motels, restaurants or health care facilities, at least 2% of the total number of parking spaces must be level 1 electric vehicle charging parking spaces.(iv) For parking lots with at least 25 but fewer than 500 total parking spaces for the use of offices, schools, including colleges and universities, or industrial facilities, at least 4% of the total number of parking spaces must be level 1 electric vehicle charging parking spaces.(v) In addition to any requirement under subparagraph (iii) or (iv), for parking lots with at least 25 but fewer than 500 total parking spaces for the use of retail facilities, hotels, motels, offices or industrial facilities, at least 1% of the total number of parking spaces must be level 2 electric vehicle charging 20250HB2089PN2725 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parking spaces.(vi) In addition to any requirement under subparagraph (iii) or (iv), for parking lots with at least 25 but fewer than 500 total parking spaces for the use of restaurants, health care facilities or schools, including colleges and universities, at least 2% of the total number of parking spaces must be level 2 electric vehicle charging parking spaces.(vii) For parking lots with 500 or more total parking spaces for the use of retail facilities, hotels, motels, restaurants, health care facilities or industrial facilities, at least 1% of the total number of parking spaces must be level 1 electric vehicle charging parking spaces.(viii) For parking lots with 500 or more total parking spaces for the use of offices or schools, including colleges and universities, at least 2% of the total number of parking spaces must be level 1 electric vehicle charging parking spaces.(ix) In addition to any requirement under subparagraph (vii) or (viii), for parking lots with 500 or more total parking spaces for the use of retail facilities, hotels, motels, restaurants, health care facilities, industrial facilities, offices and schools, including colleges and universities, at least five level 2 electric vehicle charging parking spaces are required.(2) Electrical service capacity includes use of a listed cabinet, box or enclosure connected to a conduit linking the parking spaces with the electrical service.(3) Fifty percent of the required electric vehicle 20250HB2089PN2725 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charging parking spaces shall have electric vehicle supply equipment or receptacles necessary to function as available electric vehicle charging upon building occupancy. The remainder shall be prewired to allow for installation as needed for use by customers, employees or other users.(4) Parking spaces with electric vehicle supply equipment shall be marked for electric vehicle use only.(5) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Level 1." One 120V 20 amp grounded AC receptacle, National Electrical Manufacturers Association (NEMA) 5-20R or equivalent, within five feet of the centerline of each electric vehicle charging parking space."Level 2." One 208/240V 40 amp grounded connection for electric vehicle charging through dedicated electric vehicle supply equipment with a J1772 connector or AC receptacle, NEMA 14-50 or equivalent, within five feet of the centerline for each electric vehicle charging parking spaces.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2089PN2725 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920